en: Whole tunas
de: Ganze Thunfische
fi: kokonaiset tonnikalat
fr: Thons entiers
hr: Cijele tunjevine
it: Tonno intero
nl: Hele tonijn

en: Frozen whole tunas
fr: Thons entiers surgelés

en: Atlantic bluefin tunas, atlantic bluefin tuna, northern bluefin tunas, giant bluefin tunas
de: Roter Thun, Großer Thun, Nordatlantischer Thun, Blauflossen-Thunfische
fr: thons rouges, thon rouge
hr: Atlantske plavoperajne tune
ja: タイセイヨウクロマグロ
la: Thunnus thynnus, Scomber thynnus
nl: Blauwvintonijn
ro: Bucăți de ton

en: Smoked tunas
fr: Thons fumés, thon fumé
hr: Dimljena tuna
it: Tonno affumicato
nl: Gerookte tonijn
ru: Тунец копчёный, Копчёный тунец

en: Roasted Tuna, Baked tuna
fr: Thon rôti, thon cuit au four

en: Longtail tuna
de: Langschwanz-Thun
fr: thon mignon
hr: Dugorepa tuna
ja: コシナガ
la: Thunnus tonggol
nl: Tonggoltonijn

en: Canned tunas
bg: Консерви риба тон
de: Thunfischkonserve
es: Atun en conserva
fi: purkitetut tonnikalat
fr: Thons en conserve, Thon en conserve, Conserve de thons
he: טונה בקופסה, טונה בקופסא, שימורי טונה
hr: Konzervirana tunjevina
it: Tonno in scatola, tonni in scatola
nl: Tonijn in blik/pot
pt: Atuns em lata, atun em lata
ro: Conserve de ton
ru: Консервы из тунца, Консервы тунцовые

en: Tunas in oil, Canned tuna in oil
bg: Риба тон в олио
de: Thunfische in Öl
es: Atún en aceite
fi: Tonnikalat öljyssä
fr: Thons à l’huile, thon à l'huile, Thon à l'huile appertisé, Thon à l'huile en conserve
he: טונה בשמן
hr: Tune u ulju
it: Tonno sott'olio, tonni sott'olio
nl: Tonijn op olie
pt: Atuns em óleo
ru: Консервированный тунец в масле

en: Tuna chunks
bg: Парченца риба тон
de: Thunfisch Stücke
fi: tonnikalaa paloina
fr: Miettes de thon
hr: Komadiće tune
it: Tranci di tonno
nl: Tonijnstukjes

en: tuna flakes in tomato sauce, Canned tuna flakes in tomato sauce
bg: Парченца риба тон в доматен сос
fr: Miettes de thon à la tomate, Miettes de thon à la tomate en conserve, Miettes de thon à la tomate appertisées
hr: Pahuljice tune u umaku od rajčice

en: tuna flakes in oil, Canned tuna flakes in oil
fr: Miettes de thon à l'huile, Miettes de thon à l'huile en conserve, Miettes de thon à l'huile appertisées

en: Tunas in escabèche sauce
fr: Thons à l'escabèche

en: Tuna mayo
fr: Thons à la mayonnaise, Thon à la mayonnaise
hr: Majoneza od tune
ja: ツナマヨネーズ, ツナマヨ

en: Tuna in Catalan-style, Tuna in tomato sauce, Tunas with tomato sauce
fr: Thons à la catalane, Thon à la catalane, Thons à la tomate, Thon à la tomate

en: Tuna in olive oil
bg: Риба тон в дървено масло
de: Thunfische in Olivenöl, Thunfisch in Olivenöl
es: Atún en aceite de oliva
fr: Thons à l’huile d’olive, thon à l'huile d'olive
hr: Tuna u maslinovom ulju
it: Tonno sott'olio di oliva
nl: Tonijn op olijfolie
pt: Atum em azeite de oliveira
ru: Тунец в масле

es: Atún claro en aceite de oliva
fr: Thons pales à l'huile d'olive

en: Tunas in sunflower oil
bg: Риба тон в слънчогледово олио
de: Thunfische in Sonnenblumenöl, Thunfisch in Sonnenblumenöl
es: Atún en aceite de girasol
fr: Thons à l’huile de tournesol
hr: Tune u suncokretovom ulju
it: Tonno in olio di girasole
nl: Tonijn op zonnebloemolie
pt: Atuns em óleo de girassol

en: Tunas in brine, tuna in brine
bg: Риба тон в собствен сос
de: Thunfische im eigenen Saft
es: Atún al natural
fi: tonnikalaa vedessä
fr: Thons au naturel, thon au naturel, conserves de thon au naturel, conserve de thon au naturel
hr: Tune u salamuri
it: Tonno al naturale
nl: Tonijn natuur

en: Albacore
de: Weißer Thun
es: Bonito del Norte
fi: Valkotonnikalat
fr: Thons blancs, Thons germon, thons blanc germon, germon, thon blanc germon
hr: Albacore
ja: ビンナガ
la: Thunnus alalunga
nl: Witte tonijn
zh: 长鳍金枪鱼

fr: Thons blancs au naturel
it: Tonno bianco al naturale
nl: Witte tonijn natuur